Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1074.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 604. Contracts for sale of dogs and cats.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a contract to transfer ownership of a dog or cat in which ownership or repossession of the dog or cat is contingent upon the making of payments over a period of time subsequent to the 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 transfer of possession of the dog or cat is void as against public policy.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to payments to repay an unsecured loan for the purchase of a dog or cat.(c) Leases.--A contract entered into for the lease of a dog or cat that provides for or offers the option of transferring ownership of the dog or cat at the end of the lease term is void as against public policy.(d) Remedy.--In addition to any other remedies provided by law, the consumer taking possession of a dog or cat transferred under a contract or lease described in subsection (a) or (c) shall be deemed the owner of the dog or cat and shall also be entitled to the return of all amounts the consumer paid under the contract or lease.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the enforcement of any other provision of this act.(f) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "consumer" shall mean an individual.Section 2. The addition of section 604 of the act shall apply to contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1074PN1173 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223